District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-421

Treatment of professional corporation as unincorporated business for purpose of franchise tax.

Repealed.

Sept. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-16, § 2(a), 32 DCR 3578

History

2001 Ed., § 29-421.
1981 Ed., § 29-621.

Prior Codifications